Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1487.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 526 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 526. Polling Places to Be Selected by County Board.--* * *(a.1) The county board of elections in a county of the first class shall provide an additional polling place in the county 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 prison for individuals registering their residence at the prison under section 703(4)(ii).* * *Section 2. Section 703 of the act is amended to read:Section 703. Residence of Electors.--For the purpose of registration and voting, no person shall be deemed to have gained a residence by reason of his presence, or lost it by reason of his absence, [while] in any of the following circumstances:(1) Being employed in the service, either civil or military, of [this State] the Commonwealth or of the United States[, nor while].(2) Being engaged in the navigation of the waters of [the State] this Commonwealth or of the United States, or on the high seas[, nor while].(3) Being a student of any institution of learning[, nor while kept in any poorhouse or other asylum].(4) Being in an institution at public expense[, nor while confined in public prison, except that any]. This paragraph does not apply to any of the following:(i) A veteran who resides in a home for disabled and indigent soldiers and sailors, operated and maintained by the Commonwealth [of Pennsylvania,] and who possesses all the qualifications for voting. [, may gain a residence for registration and voting at the home for disabled and indigent soldiers and sailors. The provisions of this amendment shall not be construed to affect the voting rights of bedridden or hospitalized veterans who choose to vote as absentee electors by the use of veteran's official ballots.] The veteran may elect to use that residence for registration and voting or elect to vote 20250HB1487PN1741 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as an absentee elector by the use of an absentee ballot.(ii) An individual who is incarcerated in a county prison in a county of the first class and who is awaiting trial or sentencing or serving a sentence for a misdemeanor or summary offense. The individual may elect to utilize that residence for registration and voting or elect to vote as an absentee elector by the use of an absentee ballot.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1487PN1741 - 3 - 12345678